Missouri, session 2026, HB2002.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 2.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 2
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Elementary
and Secondary Education in implementing the appropriations
found in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be
comprised in whole or in part of a one-time amount, and such
one-time amount shall be construed to be a component part of,
and not in addition to, the stated appropriation amount. Any
amount of an appropriation identified as “one-time” in this act
shall not be considered an addition to any ongoing core
appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond June 30, 2027.
Any amount identified as one-time may, however, be requested
in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 2.005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Division of Financial and Administrative Services, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 2.455
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,860,797
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 150,134
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,010,931
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,576,451
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 709,957
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..............................3,286,408
For the Division of Financial and Administrative Services
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For administrative expenses
Personal Service ....................................................................................................61,186
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 114,156
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................175,342

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 3
Personal Service ....................................................................................................61,186
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 142,695
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................... 203,881
Total (Not to exceed 81.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,676,562
Section 2.010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For refunds
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................$2,510,000
Section 2.015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For distributions to the free public schools of $4,689,311,449 under the
School Foundation Program as provided in Chapter 163, RSMo,
provided that no funds are used to support the distribution or
sharing of any individually identifiable student data for non-
educational purposes, marketing or advertising, as follows:
For the Foundation Formula
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................$2,530,984,267
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) (one-time) ...........................................................................................73,886,306
From Sports Wagering for Education Fund (1244) .....................................................6,805,078
From Outstanding Schools Trust Fund (1287) ........................................................837,164,727
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ........................................................................106,573,506
From State School Moneys Fund (1616) .................................................................259,965,973
From Blind Pension Fund (1621) (one-time).............................................................45,000,000
From Classroom Trust Fund (1784) ........................................................................420,356,143
From State Public School Fund (1817) ................................................................ 2,000,000
Total Foundation Formula ....................................................................................4,282,736,000
For Transportation
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................287,493,512
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) (one-time) ...........................................................................................15,208,835
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 73,873,102
Total Transportation .................................................................................................376,575,449
For the Small Schools Program

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 4
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 30,000,000
Total ....................................................................................................................$4,689,311,449
Section 2.025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For State Board of Education operated school programs, provided fifteen
percent (15%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$35,533,096
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 19,383,589
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................54,916,685
Personal Service ..................................................................................................943,274
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,014,091
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ............................13,957,365
Expense and Equipment
From Bingo Proceeds for Education Fund (1289) ............................................... 1,876,355
Total (Not to exceed 630.53 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$70,750,405
Section 2.030. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For pre-kindergarten education program grants to child care facilities as
defined in Section 210.201, RSMo, that are licensed under
Section 210.221, RSMo, or that are unlicensed and registered
with the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education to
serve students in the year prior to kindergarten eligibility in a
program consistent with Section 161.213, RSMo, with
reimbursements not to exceed $7,145 per individual child
receiving a minimum of 1,044 hours of instruction, or the
adjusted state adequacy amount as determined for the purposes
of the foundation formula under Chapter 163, RSMo for that
fiscal year, whichever is less, and further provided priority given
to students at or below 185% of the federal poverty level not
already receiving a full child care subsidy for the same
instructional services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 5
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,234,588
Section 2.035. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For pre-kindergarten education program grants to local education
agencies to serve students, or contract to serve students, in the
year prior to kindergarten eligibility in a program consistent with
Section 161.213, RSMo, with reimbursements not to exceed the
product of the state adequacy target of $7,145, or the adjusted
state adequacy target, whichever is less, and the dollar value
modifier per each average daily attendance as defined in Section
163.011, RSMo, with priority given to students at or below 185%
of the federal poverty level
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,830,843
Section 2.040. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For Career Ladder, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this section and Section 2.045, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
2.240
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$150,000
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................29,929,168
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 22,467,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$52,546,168
Section 2.045. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Teacher Baseline Salary Grant Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$33,421,374

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 6
For a grant program to provide a baseline educator salary of $40,000,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
section and Section 2.040
Program Distribution
From Teacher Baseline Salary Grant Fund (1306) .............................................. 33,421,374
Total .........................................................................................................................$66,842,748
Section 2.050. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a not-for-profit organization that focuses on health, hunger, and
hygiene, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 2.055. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the School Nutrition Services Program to reimburse schools for
school food programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,412,151
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................... 327,908,012
Total .......................................................................................................................$331,320,163
Section 2.060. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For planning, design, procurement, and implementation of a K-3 reading
assessment system for preliminary identification of students at
risk for dyslexia and related disorders including analysis of
phonological and phonemic awareness, rapid automatic naming,
alphabetic principle, phonics, reading fluency, spelling, reading
accuracy, vocabulary, and reading comprehension
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$400,000
Section 2.064. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For a program to recruit, train, and/or develop teachers to teach in
academically struggling school districts

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 7
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$750,000
Section 2.065. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
To reimburse school districts and charters for costs associated
with reading assessments, designated reading programs, supplies,
and other reading materials
From Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund (1214) ..........................$14,000,000
Section 2.070. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the instruction of teachers and administrators in an evidence-based
literacy program as provided in subsection 161.241.5, RSMo
From Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund (1214) ............................$3,000,000
Section 2.074. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a program dedicated to educational enrichment, tutoring, and support
in the areas of science, technology, engineering, and math serving
underserved and low-income students in a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 2.075. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Computer Science Education Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$450,000
Section 2.080. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For Computer Science Education
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$54,507
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,007
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................64,514

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 8
For Computer Science Education
From Computer Science Education Fund (1423) ................................................ 450,000
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$514,514
Section 2.084. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a nonprofit organization that engages solely men and fathers that
operates a tutoring (reading) literacy program focused on
underserved youth in a city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$200,000
Section 2.085. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For distributions to the public elementary and secondary schools in this
state, pursuant to Chapters 144, 163, and 164, RSMo, pertaining
to the School District Trust Fund
From School District Trust Fund (1688) ............................................................$1,306,961,000
Section 2.090. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Missouri Scholars and Fine Arts Academies
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$675,000
Section 2.095. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a school-based mental health coordinator
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$91,361
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,019
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ...............................$107,380
Section 2.100. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For grants to establish safe schools programs addressing active shooter
response training and school safety measures, including the
hiring of school counselors to provide students with mental health
services pertaining to suicide and other behavioral health needs,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 9
provided that grants are to be distributed by a statewide education
organization whose directors consist entirely of public school
board members
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
For the purpose of supporting safe schools programs pursuant to Section
160.664, RSMo, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 2.455
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 19,992
Total ..............................................................................................................................$519,992
Section 2.101. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the purpose of supporting safe schools programs, including the
development, review, and practice of Emergency Operations
Plans utilizing an all-hazards approach, with consideration for the
needs of students with disabilities; for utilization of an online
customizable Emergency Operations Plans tool; for providing
incident command system and structure training; for cyber and
artificial intelligence (AI) threat management; and for resources
and training related to physical site assessments; funds shall be
distributed to a statewide education organization whose
governing board consists entirely of public school board
members; the organization shall have a flexibility allowance of
up to three percent of the total appropriation for administrative
and operational purposes related to the implementation of this
section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
Section 2.105. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization whose mission is to assist youth with
substance use disorder services for the establishment of a
recovery high school pursuant to Section 167.850, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 2.110. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 10
For the Virtual Schools Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$166,900
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 389,778
Total ..............................................................................................................................$556,678
Section 2.115. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For costs associated with school district bonds
From School District Bond Fund (1248) ......................................................................$492,000
Section 2.120. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General Assembly
provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of the
source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be
expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service ....................................................................................................$4,183
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 46,500
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................................50,683
Expense and Equipment
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................... 6,000,303
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,050,986
Section 2.125. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Division of Learning Services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455, and
further provided that no funds are used to support the collection,
distribution, or sharing of any individually identifiable student
data with the federal government; with the exception of the
reporting requirements of the Migrant Education Program funds
in Section 2.195, the Vocational Rehabilitation funds in Section
2.250, and the Disability Determination funds in Section 2.255
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,064,268
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 353,593
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,417,861

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 11
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,335,056
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,473,191
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..............................9,808,247
Personal Service ..................................................................................................965,896
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,319,987
From Excellence in Education Fund (1651) ................................................................3,285,883
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitative Services
Personal Service .............................................................................................41,129,076
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,700,549
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................... 44,829,625
Total (Not to exceed 857.20 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$63,341,616
Section 2.130. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a statewide longitudinal data system
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$752,000
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................... 1,849,907
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,601,907
Section 2.140. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Performance Based Assessment Program, provided that no funds
are used to support the collection, distribution, or sharing of any
individually identifiable student data with the federal
government; with the exception of the reporting requirements of
the Migrant Education Program funds in Section 2.195, the
Vocational Rehabilitation funds in Section 2.250, and the
Disability Determination funds in Section 2.255, and further
provided that no funds from this section shall be used for license
fees or membership dues for the Smarter Balanced Assessment
Consortium
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,972,212
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..............................8,567,628
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 4,311,255
Total .........................................................................................................................$21,851,095

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 12
Section 2.147. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For a program identifying where students may lack adequate access to
resources and support
Program Distribution
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ............................................................$320,000
Section 2.150. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the design, renovation, construction, and improvements of career and
technical schools and/or Comprehensive High Schools, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,500,000
Section 2.155. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For career center operations and/or Comprehensive High Schools
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.160. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For Career and Technical Education, provided that no funds are used for
advertising
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$52,071,607
For distributions to providers of career and technical education programs
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105)
(including $3,600,000 one-time) .............................................................. 34,301,460
Total .........................................................................................................................$86,373,067
Section 2.162. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 13
For an organization that teaches mentorship skills with an emphasis on
student learning of business standards and operational expertise
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$400,000
Section 2.163. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For nationally recognized career readiness assessments to be made
available for all eleventh or twelfth grade students that measure
foundational career readiness skills, including applied
mathematics, workplace documents, and graphic literacy and
lead to a nationally recognized work-readiness credential that is
used by site selectors to rank states for site selection and
economic development
From Sports Wagering for Education Fund (1244) (one-time) .................................$1,200,000
Section 2.165. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For supporting and expanding Registered Youth Apprenticeship
programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$611,000
Section 2.170. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Missouri Career Advising Initiative
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,500,000
Section 2.175. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For dyslexia programs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...................................................................................$107
From Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund (1214) ...................... 600,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$600,107

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 14
Section 2.180. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Missouri Healthy Schools, Successful Students Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...............................$449,126
Section 2.185. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Missouri Project AWARE program to address the mental health
needs of youth
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ............................$1,706,948
Section 2.190. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Comprehensive Literacy Development Program
Expense and Equipment ....................................................................................$813,735
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 10,185,429
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$10,999,164
Section 2.195. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For improving the academic achievement of the disadvantaged programs
operated by local education agencies under Title I of the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as amended by
the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
2.320, and further provided three (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Sections 2.210, 2.215, 2.220, and 2.225
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ........................$227,840,470
Section 2.196. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For establishing a competitive grant program using federal Title I funds
to support innovation, improvement, and expansion of high-
quality public schools, provided that grants awarded under this

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 15
section shall be in the amount of not less than one million dollars
($1,000,000) per recipient
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$10,000,000
Section 2.200. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For facilitating the identification, enrollment, attendance, and success in
school of homeless children and youths under Title IX, Part A of
the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105)
(including $781,694 one-time).......................................................................$2,181,694
Section 2.205. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For programs for the gifted from interest earnings accruing in the
Stephen Morgan Ferman Memorial for Education of the Gifted
From State School Moneys Fund (1616) ..........................................................................$9,027
Section 2.210. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Supporting Effective Instruction Grants Program pursuant to
Title II of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965
as amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$35,001,143
Section 2.215. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Rural Education Initiative grants pursuant to Title V, Part B of
the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ............................$3,225,567
Section 2.220. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 16
For the Office of Quality Schools
For language acquisition pursuant to Title III of the Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965 as amended by the Every
Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ............................$4,891,794
Section 2.225. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For Student Support and Enrichment grants pursuant to Title IV, Part A
of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$24,840,365
Section 2.226. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the purpose of establishing and administering a pilot program to
support participating local education agencies in the development
and implementation of an online transparency portal providing
parental and public access to curriculum materials and school
library resources used by such agencies; provided that the
Department shall select six participating local education
agencies, consisting of two large, two medium, and two small
local education agencies
From Sports Wagering for Education Fund (1244) (one-time) ....................................$400,000
Section 2.230. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Teacher of the Year Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) .................................$40,000
From Excellence in Education Fund (1651) ........................................................ 150,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$190,000
Section 2.235. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
Funds to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Teacher
Recruitment and Retention State Scholarship Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 17
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$800,000
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ...............................................................................800,000
For the Teacher Recruitment and Retention State Scholarship Program
Program Distribution
From Teacher Recruitment and Retention State Scholarship Fund
(1221) ....................................................................................................... 1,600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,200,000
Section 2.240. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Missouri Leadership Development System program
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$600,000
From Excellence in Education Fund (1651) ........................................................ 600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,200,000
Section 2.245. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Missouri Teacher Development System program
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,600,000
Section 2.250. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services
For the Vocational Rehabilitation Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,043,071
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ............................................................63,706,717
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................1,400,000
For Payments by the Department of Mental Health
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................... 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$85,149,788
Section 2.255. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 18
For the Disability Determination Program
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..........................................................$20,175,837
Section 2.260. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services
For Independent Living Centers, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,060,000
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..............................................................2,675,306
From Independent Living Center Fund (1284) ...............................................................190,556
For an equal increase on a percentage basis for Independent Living
Centers that receive additional funding directly from the federal
government
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................160,555
For equalization of state funding to Independent Living Centers that do
not receive additional funding directly from the federal
government
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,739,446
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,825,863
Section 2.265. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For distributions to educational institutions for the Adult Basic Education
Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 2.455
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................$10,542
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 5,004,326
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,014,868
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................................15,812
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 10,098,482
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................... 10,114,294
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,129,162
Section 2.266. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 19
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a workforce diploma program for adults without a high school
diploma as designated by the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,500,000
Section 2.270. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Special Education Program, provided twenty-five (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.290
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ........................$273,512,035
Section 2.275. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For special education excess costs
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$54,651,355
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 19,590,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$74,241,355
Section 2.280. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,967,234
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 190,499
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,157,733
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,666,931
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 154,428
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..............................1,821,359
Personal Service ...............................................................................................8,617,515
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,025,088
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............... 10,642,603
Total (Not to exceed 212.50 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$15,621,695
Section 2.285. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 20
For the Office of Childhood
For the Early Childhood Special Education Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$234,761,207
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ..........................................................................16,548,507
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ............ 21,464,533
Total .......................................................................................................................$272,774,247
Section 2.290. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the Special Education Program, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.270
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$27,000,000
Section 2.295. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Early Childhood Development, provided that the Department of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall coordinate the
delivery of Parent Education Services with the Home Visiting
Programs within the Office of Administration, and further
provided no funds shall be used to provide Parent Education
Services for which enrollment is required as a condition of any
other program, or is in any manner not voluntary to enroll in as a
standalone program; and further provided no funds shall be used
to provide Parent Education Services for virtual visits; and further
provided the Department make available annual reporting of the
number of children enrolled during any period in both Parent
Education Services and a local education agency pre-
kindergarten program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$23,418,975
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ....................5,000,000
For reimbursements to school districts for Parent Education in
conjunction with the Early Childhood Education and Screening
Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................198,200

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 21
For Early Childhood Development in unaccredited or provisionally
accredited districts, provided that the Department of Elementary
and Secondary Education shall coordinate the delivery of Parent
Education Services with the Home Visiting Programs within the
Office of Administration
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$29,117,175
Section 2.300. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For a book gifting program that mails free, high-quality books to children
from birth to age five
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 2.305. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For development of a voluntary early learning quality assurance report
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$119,713
For receiving and expending early childhood education grants
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................... 17,200,043
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,319,756
Section 2.310. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the First Steps Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$63,844,655
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ............................12,311,843
From Part C Early Intervention System Fund (1788) .......................................... 11,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$87,656,498
Section 2.315. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 22
For the Language Equality and Acquisition for Deaf Kids (LEAD-K) Act
pursuant to Section 161.396, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$445,327
Section 2.320. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For improving the academic achievement of the disadvantaged programs
operated by local education agencies under Title I of the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended
by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
2.195
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$31,411,225
Section 2.325. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the School Age Afterschool Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ..........................$20,314,673
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) .......................1,263,063
For before and after school programs, provided that such funds shall be
awarded through a competitive grant process
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,398,064
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ............ 295,399
Total .........................................................................................................................$29,271,199
Section 2.330. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Child Care Quality Initiatives, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
For the general administration of the quality initiatives programs,
including development and implementation of automated
systems to enhance time, attendance reporting, contract
compliance, payment accuracy, monitoring, referral services,
professional development, Early Head Start, parent education,
background screenings, and to support the Educare Program

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 23
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,735,970
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) .....................37,342,504
For quality assurance rating
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................500,000
For enhancing child care health and safety practices through provider
outreach
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) .................................259,000
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................414,362
For activities to improve the quality of childcare, increase the availability
of early childhood development programs, before and after
school care, in-home services for families with newborn children,
and for general administration of the program
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) .................................462,565
For early childhood development, education, and care programs for low-
income families
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,500,000
For innovation grants
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............... 10,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$55,214,401
Section 2.331. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the implementation of a program to support child care providers
across the state of Missouri, with funding to support: recruitment
and licensing of new child care providers and workforce to
increase access to quality child care for families statewide;
business optimization, training, and sustainability support for
existing child care providers to enhance program quality and
operations; development of digital resources for providers,
including professional business websites with tools for
enrollment management, invoicing, expense reporting, and
parent communications; connection and building of an online
searchable platform with an interactive map to show geographic

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 24
location, subsidy acceptance, age ranges, schedule, slot
availability, and program features; and provision of in-person
community-building events, personalized coaching, marketing
assistance, and enrollment in training programs designed to
improve business operations for child care providers
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)
(one-time) .......................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 2.335. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Child Care Subsidy, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 2.340 and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
For child care subsidy payments for low-income families, provided that
the income thresholds for child care subsidies shall be a full
traditional subsidy benefit for individuals with an income which
is less than or equal to 150 percent of the federal poverty level; a
transitional benefit with a sliding scale fee for individuals with an
income which is less than or equal to 185 percent of the federal
poverty level but greater than 150 percent of the federal poverty
level; a transitional benefit with a sliding scale fee for individuals
with an income which is less than or equal to 215 percent of the
federal poverty level but greater than 185 percent of federal
poverty level
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$138,599,649
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ...................142,042,947
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859)
(including $17,150,480 one-time) ..................................................................22,538,404
Expense and Equipment
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............... 1,616,328
Total .......................................................................................................................$304,797,328
Section 2.340. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Child Care Subsidy, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed between this section and Section 2.335, and further

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 25
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.455
For child care subsidy payments for children under the care or custody
of the Department of Social Services Children's Division,
provided the subsidy paid to providers on behalf of children in
legal custody of the Children's Division shall be no less than the
market rate by region and provider-type, in accordance with the
2024 market rate study performed by or for the office
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$23,814,460
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) .....................31,605,343
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ............ 1,891,177
Total .........................................................................................................................$57,310,980
Section 2.345. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For payments to school districts for children in residential placements
through the Department of Mental Health or the Department of
Social Services pursuant to Section 167.126, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,692,315
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................4,750,000
For payments to school districts for children in residential placements
through the Department of Mental Health or the Department of
Social Services pursuant to Section 167.126, RSMo, provided
that said placements make up at least thirty percent (30%) of an
eligible district’s prior year average daily attendance
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,692,315
Section 2.347. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For funding of a school within a school to provide a turn-key intervention
program that educates at-risk middle school students to learn in
highly innovative, highly engaging, hands-on STEM-focused
curriculum, provided such program shall have documented
results of improving students up to two grade levels in one school
year as proven in other states, and further provided such

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 26
appropriation shall be distributed in $1,000,000 grant increments
to each school district which applies for the grant
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.350. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Sheltered Workshops Program, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$30,000,000
Section 2.355. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For payments to readers for blind or visually disabled students in the
elementary and secondary schools, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$25,000
Section 2.360. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For a task force on blind student academic and vocational performance,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$232,017
Section 2.365. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri School for the Deaf
From School for the Deaf Trust Fund (1922) .................................................................$49,500
Section 2.370. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri School for the Blind
From School for the Blind Trust Fund (1920) ...........................................................$1,500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 27
Section 2.375. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri Special Olympics Program, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.455
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
Section 2.380. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri Schools for the Severely Disabled
From Handicapped Children’s Trust Fund (1618) ........................................................$200,000
Section 2.385. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Charter Public School Commission, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$720,603
Expense and Equipment (including $9,898 one-time) ............................. 2,846,755
From Charter Public School Commission Revolving Fund (1860) .............................3,567,358
Expense and Equipment
From Charter Public School Commission Federal Fund (1175) ......................... 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$4,067,358
Section 2.390. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.455
Personal Service ................................................................................................$438,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 233,512
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................672,046
For grants to organizations providing deaf-blind services pursuant to
Section 161.412.1, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................300,000
Personal Service ....................................................................................................43,248

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 28
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 119,000
From Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Fund
(1743) ..................................................................................................................162,248
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Board of
Certification of Interpreters Fund (1264) ................................................. 152,527
Total (Not to exceed 7.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,286,821
Section 2.395. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Statewide Hearing Aid Distribution Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
Section 2.400. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
For the Statewide Hearing Aid Distribution Program
From Statewide Hearing Aid Distribution Fund (1617) ...............................................$200,000
Section 2.405. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Holocaust Education and Awareness Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$122,354
Section 2.410. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Assistive Technology Council
Personal Service ................................................................................................$272,500
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 572,601
From Assistive Technology Federal Fund (1188) ..........................................................845,101
Personal Service ..................................................................................................314,956
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,639,948
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program Fund
(1559) ...............................................................................................................1,954,904

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 29
Personal Service ....................................................................................................70,851
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 675,000
From Assistive Technology Loan Revolving Fund (1889) ............................................745,851
Expense and Equipment
From Assistive Technology Trust Fund (1781) ...........................................................1,280,050
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 1,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.40 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$4,826,906
Section 2.415. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to the General Revenue Fund-County Foreign Tax Distribution,
to the State School Moneys Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$204,529,672
Section 2.420. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
School Moneys Fund
From Fair Share Fund (1687) ..................................................................................$19,200,000
Section 2.425. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Outstanding Schools Trust Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$836,600,000
Section 2.430. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Classroom Trust Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285) ..............................................$385,000,000
Section 2.435. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 30
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Classroom Trust Fund
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ........................................................................$23,356,143
Section 2.440. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the School
District Bond Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285) .....................................................$492,000
Section 2.445. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
School Moneys Fund
From School Building Revolving Fund (1279) .........................................................$1,500,000
Section 2.450. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
School Moneys Fund
From After-School Retreat Reading and Assessment Grant Program
Fund (1732) ...........................................................................................................$2,000
Section 2.455. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Sections 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 2.2010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to Section 2.335 and Section 2.340 of Part 1 of this
act:
The Office of Childhood may, upon approval by the
Administration for Children and Families, modify the current

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 31
reimbursement system to allow up to 10 absences, including
holidays, per month for children authorized to attend 20 or more
units per month and up to 6 absences per month for children
authorized to attend 19 or fewer units per month. Any necessary
rate changes to implement the new reimbursement shall be set to
maintain access for children currently enrolled in the child care
subsidy program and may be weighted across age groups to
balance program costs.
Except to the extent expressly authorized in Section 2.340 of Part
1 of this act for payments made on behalf of children under the
care or custody of the Department of Social Services Children’s
Division, no funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider
rates greater than the 100th percentile of the current child care
market for infant and toddler provider rates, as determined by the
2024 child care market rate survey, or greater than the 65th
percentile of the current child care market for pre-kindergarten
and school-age provider rates, as determined by the 2024 child
care market rate survey.
Payments to providers shall not be made prospectively.
The Department shall require rate documentation from all
providers for any future rate study sufficient to validate reported
rates and shall not rely solely upon unaudited self-reported survey
responses.
The Office of Childhood shall work with a group of stakeholders
to evaluate the role of enhancements in the child care subsidy
program and, as warranted, make adjustments to balance rates,
availability, and quality to improve access to low-income
families and address child care availability shortages. The Office
shall provide a report summarizing the findings and
recommendations of the stakeholder group to the Governor’s
Office, the Senate Appropriations Chair, the House Budget Chair,
and the Ranking Members no later than November 1, 2026.
Section 2.2020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act:
In order to ensure school safety, all schools shall participate in
the state’s efforts to monitor and identify dangerous drugs in the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 32
schools to include fentanyl and nitazenes, provided that the state
provides all of the funding for the monitoring.
PART 3
Section 2.3005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly expenditures and
projections for Child Care subsidy program for the current state
fiscal year and next state fiscal year to the House Budget and
Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members
on a monthly basis.
Section 2.3010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification prior to
submission to the federal government of state plans, state plan
amendments, waivers, waiver amendments, and waiver renewals,
and quarterly financial reports, to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members. The
Department shall include in the notification the actual documents
submitted to the federal government, as well as the federal
government’s responses when received.
Section 2.3015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide notification and correspondence
from the federal government of non-compliance with federal
programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members.
Section 2.3020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2002 33
The Department shall provide written notification of spend plans
and spend plan amendments to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriations Committee Chairs and Ranking Members prior to
submission to the federal government and prior to expenditure of
such funds.
Section 2.3025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
The Department shall direct deposits of moneys received by the
state from the federal government for the Child Care and
Development Fund into the Child Care and Development Block
Grant Federal Fund (1168).
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (791.33 F.T.E.) ..............................................................$4,767,254,087
Federal Funds (988.55 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................1,492,676,938
Other Funds (26.75 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 2,169,602,169
Total (1,806.63 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$8,429,533,194
